Utah statutes.
4-37-104.   Department's responsibilities.

(1) The department is responsible for:

(a)  the marketing and promotion of the state's aquaculture industry; and

(b)  enforcing laws and rules made by the Wildlife Board governing species of aquatic animals which may be imported into the state or possessed or transported within the state that are applicable to aquaculture or fee fishing facilities.

(2)  Subject to the policies and rules of the Fish Health Policy Board, the department shall:

(a)  act to prevent the outbreak and act to control the spread of disease-causing pathogens among aquatic animals in aquaculture and fee fishing facilities; and

(b)  act to prevent the spread of disease-causing pathogens from aquatic animals in, to be deposited in, or harvested from aquaculture or fee fishing facilities to aquatic wildlife, other animals, and humans.



Amended by Chapter 302, 1998 General Session

